Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.196

Firearms—Special allegation.

A prosecutor may file a special allegation that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed the alleged offense. If a special allegation has been filed and the court finds that the offender committed the alleged offense, the court shall also make a finding whether the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed the offense.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 526.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.